Louisiana, session 2026, HB418.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:5108.1.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5108.1.1. Defense and indemnification of officials, officers, or employees of a
political subdivision
A. A political subdivision shall defend, indemnify against loss or liability,
and hold harmless any of its officials, officers, or employees whenever a claim or
demand is made or threatened, or whenever such persons are proceeded against in
any investigation or before any court, board, commission, or other public body to
defend or maintain his official position or a position taken in the course of the
execution of his duties, or because of any act or omission arising out of the
performance of his official duties, if it is determined that the official, officer or
employee acted in good faith and in a manner he reasonably believed to be in or not
opposed to the best interests of the political subdivision. The provisions of this
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-921 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 418
Subsection do not apply if an official, officer, or employee is adjudged liable for
malfeasance in office or an intentional tort.
B. To the extent that an official, officer, or employee of a political
subdivision has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of any action,
suit, or proceeding referred to in or in defense of any claim, issue, or matter, he shall
be indemnified against expenses, including attorney fees, actually and reasonably
incurred by him in connection with his defense.
C. Expenses, including attorney fees, incurred in defending a civil action,
suit, or proceeding may be paid by the political subdivision in advance of the final
disposition of such action, suit, or proceeding as authorized in the manner provided
in this Section upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of the official, officer
or employee, to repay such amount unless a determination is made that he is entitled
to be indemnified by the political subdivision as authorized in this Section.
D. The indemnification provided by this Section shall not be deemed
exclusive of any other rights to which those indemnified may be entitled, both as to
action in his official capacity and as to action in another capacity while holding such
office, and shall continue as to a person who has ceased to be an official, officer, or
employee, and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators
of such a person.
E. A political subdivision may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf
of any person who is or was an official, officer, or employee of the political
subdivision against any liability asserted against him and incurred by him in his
capacity or arising out of his status as such, whether or not the political subdivision
would have the power to indemnify him, against liability pursuant to the provisions
of this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-921 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 418